Washington statutes.
RCW 10.37.070

Animals—Description of.

When the crime involves the taking of or injury to an animal the indictment or information is sufficiently certain in that respect if it describes the animal by the common name of its class.

[ 1891 c 28 s 26; Code 1881 s 1011; 1873 p 226 s 194; 1869 p 241 s 189; RRS s 2062.]

NOTES:

Crimes relating to animals: Chapter 9.08 RCW.

Larceny: Chapter 9A.56 RCW.